New Jersey, session 221, A2913.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Director of the Division of Investment in the Department of the Treasury shall, subject to and consistent with the directors fiduciary duties and the standard for prudent investment set forth in section 11 of P.L.1950, c.270 (C.52:18A-89), prioritize the investment or reinvestment of the assets of any pension or annuity fund under the jurisdiction of the division in an in-state infrastructure project over a comparable out-of-state project. b.    As used in this section: Infrastructure means real assets and tangible physical systems within, but not limited to, the following sectors: utilities and telecommunications; energy; transportation; airports; environmental; technological; and educational infrastructure. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.